Illinois, session 104th, SB3646.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-2006 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-2006)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-2006)7    Sec. 5-2006. Tax for Veterans Assistance Commission. The 8county board of each county having a population of less than 3 9million in which there is a Veterans Assistance Commission as 10provided in Section 9 of the Military Veterans Assistance Act 11may levy a tax of not to exceed .03% of the assessed value 12annually on all taxable property of the county, for the 13purpose of providing assistance to military veterans and their 14families pursuant to such Act. Whenever not less than 10% of 15the electors of the county petition the county board to levy 16the tax at not to exceed .04% of the assessed value, the county 17board shall certify the proposition to the proper election 18officials who shall submit the proposition at the next general 19election in accordance with the general election law. If a 20majority of the electors vote in favor of the proposition, the 21county board may, annually, levy the tax as authorized.22    The county board of each county that has a population of 23less than 3,000,000 and that is a participant in a   SB3646- 2 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission as provided in 2Section 9 of the Military Veterans Assistance Act may levy a 3tax of not to exceed .03% of the assessed value annually on all 4taxable property of the county for the purpose of providing 5assistance to military veterans and their families pursuant to 6such Act. The proceeds from this tax for a Jurisdictional 7Veterans Assistance Commission shall be directed into the 8county treasury of the county where the Jurisdictional 9Veterans Assistance Commission is headquartered.10    The respective proceeds of any tax so levied for a 11Veterans Assistance Commission or a Jurisdictional Veterans 12Assistance Commission shall be used exclusively for the 13assistance purposes authorized thereunder, and a portion 14thereof may be expended for the salaries of any officers or 15employees of the Veterans Assistance Commission, for the 16authorized reimbursement of any officer or employee of the 17Veterans Assistance Commission, as provided in Section 10 of 18the Military Veterans Assistance Act, or for any other 19expenses incident to the administration of such assistance.20    The tax shall be separate from all other taxes which the 21county is authorized to levy on the aggregate valuation of the 22property within the county and shall not be included in any tax 23limitation of the rate upon which taxes are required to be 24extended, but shall be excluded therefrom and in addition 25thereto. The tax shall be levied and collected in like manner 26as the general taxes of the county, and, when collected, shall   SB3646- 3 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1be paid into a special fund in the county treasury and used 2only as herein authorized, or disbursed from the county 3treasury of a county in which a properly organized Veterans 4Assistance Commission is authorized under Section 3-11008 of 5this Code.6    The limitations on tax rates herein provided may be 7increased or decreased under the referendum provisions of the 8General Revenue Law of Illinois.9    If a county has levied the tax herein authorized or 10otherwise meets the conditions set out in Section 12-21.13 of 11the Illinois Public Aid Code, to qualify for State funds to 12supplement local funds for public purposes under Articles III, 13IV, V, VI, and IX of that Code and otherwise meets the 14conditions set out in Article XII of that Code for receipt of 15State aid, the Illinois Department of Human Services shall 16allocate and pay to the county such additional sums as it 17determines to be necessary to meet the needs of assistance to 18military veterans and their families in the county and 19expenses incident to the administration of such assistance. In 20counties where a Veterans Assistance Commission has been 21properly created, those County Veterans Assistance Commissions 22shall be in charge of the administration of such assistance 23provided under the Illinois Public Aid Code for military 24veterans and their families. 25(Source: P.A. 102-732, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.)   SB3646- 4 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    Section 10. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 2changing Section 12-21.13 as follows: 3    (305 ILCS 5/12-21.13)  (from Ch. 23, par. 12-21.13)4    Sec. 12-21.13. Local funds required to qualify for state 5aid. To qualify for State funds to supplement local funds for 6public aid purposes, a local governmental unit shall, except 7as hereinafter provided, levy within the time that such levy 8is authorized to be made a tax of an amount which, when added 9to the unobligated balance available for such purposes at the 10close of the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year for which 11the tax is levied will equal .10% of the last known total 12equalized value of all taxable property in the governmental 13unit.14    In a county of less than 3 million population in which 15there is created a County Veterans Assistance Commission, the 16county shall levy for assistance to military veterans and 17their families, within the time that such levy is authorized 18to be made, a tax of an amount which, when added to the 19unobligated balance available for such purpose at the close of 20the preceding fiscal year will equal .02% of the last known 21assessed value of the taxable property in the county, or which 22will equal .03% of such assessed value if such higher amount is 23authorized by the electors of the county, as provided in 24Section 5-2006 of the Counties Code.25    In a county that has a population of less than 3,000,000   SB3646- 5 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1and that is a participant in a Jurisdictional Veterans 2Assistance Commission, the county shall levy for assistance to 3military veterans and their families, within the time that 4such levy is authorized to be made, a tax of an amount which, 5when added to the unobligated balance available for such 6purpose at the close of the preceding fiscal year, equals .02% 7of the last known assessed value of the taxable property in the 8county. The proceeds from this tax for a Jurisdictional 9Veterans Assistance Commission shall be directed into the 10county treasury of the county where the Jurisdictional 11Veterans Assistance Commission is headquartered. 12    If, however, at the latest date in the year on which the 13aforesaid taxes are authorized to be levied there is in the 14unobligated balance of the local governmental unit an amount 15equal to .10%, or .02% in the case of Veterans' Assistance, of 16the last known total equalized value of all taxable property 17in the governmental unit, then no tax need be levied in that 18year in order for the local governmental unit to qualify for 19State funds.20    In determining the amount of the unobligated balance which 21is to be applied in producing the required levy for receipt of 22State funds, or which is to be applied in determining whether a 23tax levy is required, there shall be deducted from the gross 24unobligated balance of funds available at the close of the 25preceding fiscal year the total amount of State funds 26allocated to the governmental unit during that year and the   SB3646- 6 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1total amount of any monies transferred to a township's general 2town fund under Section 235-20 of the Township Code during 3that year, and only the remainder shall be considered in 4determining the amount of the deficiency needed to produce an 5amount equal to the qualifying levy for the current year.6(Source: P.A. 87-796; 88-670, eff. 12-2-94.) 7    Section 15. The Military Veterans Assistance Act is 8amended by changing Sections 1, 2, 8, 9, 9.1, 9.2, and 10 and 9by adding Section 9.3 as follows: 10    (330 ILCS 45/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3081)11    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act:12    "Veteran service organization" means a post, ship, camp, 13chapter, or detachment of a congressionally chartered or state 14chartered organization that (i) is formed by and for veterans, 15(ii) has a paid membership of at least 15 individuals, and 16(iii) provides responsible aid, assistance, or services to the 17veteran community. 18    "Administrator of military veterans assistance" means the 19commanders of the various veteran service organizations, the 20superintendent of a County Veterans Assistance Commission, or 21other persons whose duty it is, under the existing statutes, 22to care for, relieve or maintain, wholly or in part, any person 23who may be entitled to such assistance under the statutes of 24the State of Illinois. This Act shall not infringe upon the   SB3646- 7 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1mandated powers and authorities vested in the Illinois 2Department of Veterans Affairs.3    "Armed forces" or "armed forces of the United States" 4means any of the Armed Forces of the United States, including 5any reserve component or National Guard unit. Service under 6the authority of U.S.C. Title 10, 14, or 32, State active duty, 7service in the National Guard of any state or territory 8regardless of status, and service in the State Guard as 9defined in the State Guard Act shall be considered service in 10the armed forces and armed forces of the United States for 11purposes of this Act.12    "Military veteran" or "veteran" means a person who has 13served in the armed forces and who did not receive a bad 14conduct or dishonorable discharge or other equivalent 15discharge. 16(Source: P.A. 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 17    (330 ILCS 45/2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3082)18    Sec. 2. The purpose of this Act is, in part, to provide, in 19accordance with this Section, just and necessary assistance 20and services to military veterans who served in the Armed 21Forces of the United States and whose last discharge from the 22service was honorable or general under honorable conditions, 23to their families, and to the families of deceased veterans 24with service who need such assistance and services. The 25following actions shall be taken in support of that purpose:  SB3646- 8 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1        (1) The supervisor of general assistance or the county 2    board shall annually appropriate and provide such sums of 3    money as may be just and necessary to be drawn by the 4    commander, quartermaster or commandant of any veterans 5    service organization, in the city or town, or the 6    superintendent of any Veterans' Assistance Commission of 7    the county, upon the request recommendation of the 8    assistance committee of that veterans service organization 9    or Veterans' Assistance Commission.10            (A) Funding for Veterans Assistance Commissions 11        may be derived from 3 sources, if applicable: 12                (i) a tax levied under Section 5-2006 of the 13            Counties Code and Section 12-21.13 of the Illinois 14            Public Aid Code;15                (ii) funds from the county general corporate 16            fund; and17                (iii) State funds from the Department of Human 18            Services. 19            (B) The minimum amount to be appropriated and 20        provided annually and paid on behalf of to Veterans 21        Assistance Commissions in counties with a population 22        of less than 3,000,000 is 0.02% of the last known 23        assessed value of the taxable property in the county 24        or 0.03% of such assessed value if such higher amount 25        has been authorized for levy by the electors of the 26        county as is provided in Section 12-21.13 of the   SB3646- 9 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1        Illinois Public Aid Code, unless the delegates of the 2        County Veterans Assistance Commission determine that a 3        lesser amount covers the just and necessary sums. The 4        minimum amount required under this Section to be 5        appropriated and provided annually to Veterans 6        Assistance Commissions is equal to the amount required 7        under Section 12-21.13 of the Illinois Public Aid Code 8        concerning the qualification for supplemental State 9        funds. The changes made to this subparagraph by this 10        amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are a 11        declaration of existing law and shall not be construed 12        as a new enactment. 13        (1.5) The supervisor of general assistance or the 14    county board of a county in which a Jurisdictional 15    Veterans Assistance Commission is headquartered shall 16    provide such sums of money as may be just and necessary to 17    be drawn by the superintendent of the Jurisdictional 18    Veterans Assistance Commission headquartered in that 19    county, upon the recommendation of the delegates of the 20    Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission. Each 21    participating county of a Jurisdictional Veterans 22    Assistance Commission shall fund the Jurisdictional 23    Veterans Assistance Commission in accordance with this 24    Section. Participating counties shall provide the support 25    and materials required to administer a Jurisdictional 26    Veterans Assistance Commission in the same manner   SB3646- 10 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    individual counties are required under this Act to provide 2    support and materials to single-county Veterans Assistance 3    Commissions. 4            (A) Funding for Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance 5        Commissions may be derived from a tax levied under 6        Section 5-2006 of the Counties Code and Section 7        12-21.13 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 8            (B) The minimum amount to be appropriated and 9        provided annually and paid on behalf of Jurisdictional 10        Veterans Assistance Commissions is provided in Section 11        12-21.13 of the Illinois Public Aid Code, unless the 12        delegates of the Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance 13        Commission determine that a lesser amount covers the 14        just and necessary sums. 15        (2) If any supervisor of general assistance or county 16    board fails or refuses after such request recommendation 17    to provide just and necessary sums of money for such 18    assistance, then the veterans service organization or 19    Veterans Assistance Commission or a Jurisdictional 20    Veterans Assistance Commission may request that all 21    parties involved enter into an arbitration agreement. 22    Arbitrators shall be appointed in accordance with the 23    appointment provisions in Section 3 of the Uniform 24    Arbitration Act. Arbitrators shall confer with the 25    Veterans Assistance Provost, acting on behalf of the 26    Attorney General, prior to the issuing of any award under   SB3646- 11 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    this Act. If both parties do not agree to arbitration, 2    then the veteran service organization or the 3    superintendent of any Veterans Veterans' Assistance 4    Commission located in the district of such supervisor of 5    general assistance or such county board or the 6    superintendent of any Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance 7    Commission headquartered in the district of such 8    supervisor of general assistance or such county board 9    shall apply to the circuit court of the district or county 10    for relief by mandamus upon the supervisor of general 11    assistance or county board requiring him, her or it to 12    pay, or to appropriate and pay such sums of money, and upon 13    proof made of the justice and necessity of the claim, the 14    circuit court shall grant the sums so requested and may 15    enter an order requiring the county board to pay 16    attorney's fees and an additional amount equal to or less 17    than the sum of interest of the Veterans Assistance 18    Commission's or Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance 19    Commission's initial request having accrued at the rate of 20    1% per month beginning on the month that the Veterans 21    Assistance Commission's or Jurisdictional Veterans 22    Assistance Commission's initial request was submitted to 23    the supervisor of general assistance or the county board. 24        (2.5) Any person eligible for assistance under this 25    Act who does not receive such assistance after a 26    supervisor of general assistance or county board fails or   SB3646- 12 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    refuses to provide the just and necessary sums of money to 2    fund a Veterans Assistance Commission or Jurisdictional 3    Veterans Assistance Commission may bring a civil action 4    against the county to seek redress under this Section. 5        (3) Such sums of money shall be drawn in the manner now 6    provided under Section 5-2006 of the Counties Code and 7    Section 12-21.13 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. Orders 8    of commanders, quartermasters, commandants, or 9    superintendents of those veterans service organizations or 10    those Veterans Veterans' Assistance Commissions or those 11    Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commissions shall be 12    proper warrants for the expenditure of such sums of money 13    and no county may refuse to make payment on such a warrant.14        (4) Funding for a Veterans Assistance Commission or 15    Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission granted 16    under this Section may not be disbursed to or transferred 17    from the Commission to any not-for-profit corporation or 18    any other entity of any type for the purpose of relegating 19    the responsibilities of the Veterans Assistance Commission 20    or Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission under 21    this Act to the not-for-profit corporation or other 22    entity. Funding for a Veterans Assistance Commission or 23    Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission granted 24    under this Section may not be commingled with other 25    monies. 26(Source: P.A. 102-732, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.)   SB3646- 13 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    (330 ILCS 45/8)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3088)2    Sec. 8. The commander, quartermaster, or commandant of any 3veteran service organization or the superintendent of any 4county Veterans' Assistance Commission of Illinois shall 5annually report to the Governor, on or before the first day of 6January of each year, such portions of the transactions of the 7aforementioned veteran service organization or Veterans 8Assistance Commission relating thereto as the commander or 9superintendent may deem to be of interest to that organization 10and the people of the State. A copy of that report shall be 11provided to the president or chairperson of the county board 12and shall be made publicly available online.13    The superintendent of every Veterans Assistance Commission 14and Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission shall 15annually report to the Governor, on or before the first day of 16January of each year, a summary of all minutes and voting 17results of the Veterans Assistance Commission or 18Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission from the 19previous year. Upon receipt of the report, or as soon 20thereafter as is practicable, the Office of the Governor shall 21submit a written confirmation of receipt to the superintendent 22of the Veterans Assistance Commission or Jurisdictional 23Veterans Assistance Commission that includes a statement on 24whether the Veterans Assistance Commission or Jurisdictional 25Veterans Assistance Commission is in compliance with all   SB3646- 14 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1reporting requirements under this paragraph. A copy of the 2annual report and the confirmation receipt shall be provided 3to the Office of the Attorney General and to the president or 4chairperson of the county board in which the Veterans 5Assistance Commission or Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance 6Commission is headquartered. The annual report and 7confirmation receipt shall also be made publicly available 8online. For these purposes every Veterans Assistance 9Commission and Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission 10shall maintain a website or webpage as part of its respective 11county's official website.12(Source: P.A. 102-732, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.) 13    (330 ILCS 45/9)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3089)14    Sec. 9. Veterans Assistance Commission. 15    (a) In counties having 2 or more veteran service 16organizations as may be recognized by law, the veteran service 17organizations may come together to form a Veterans Assistance 18Commission of such county. The Veterans Assistance Commission 19of such county may act as the central service office for all 20veterans and their families and for the families of deceased 21veterans. The Commission shall be composed of delegates and 22alternates from a majority of such veteran service 23organizations selected annually as determined by each veteran 24service organization. When so organized a Commission shall be 25clothed with all the powers and may be charged with all the   SB3646- 15 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1duties theretofore devolving upon the different veteran 2service organizations within the county as provided in Section 32.4        (1) Every January 1, all Veterans Assistance 5    Commissions shall publish a notice to each veteran service 6    organization within their respective county calling on 7    them to select delegates and alternates for that county's 8    Veterans Assistance Commission by the methods provided in 9    this subsection. The Veterans Assistance Commissions shall 10    allow each veteran service organization until March 1 to 11    respond, at which time those selected and duly appointed 12    delegates and alternates shall begin their term of office 13    with full voting rights. However, if any delegate or 14    alternate fails to complete the training required under 15    the Open Meetings Act within 90 days after beginning their 16    term of service, then that delegate or alternate shall be 17    stripped of any voting rights until that delegate or 18    alternate completes the training. Once selected, delegates 19    and alternates are bound by the Public Officer Prohibited 20    Activities Act. Within 30 days after the delegates and 21    alternates are seated, each Veterans Assistance Commission 22    shall publish electronically on its website, or on a 23    designated webpage of its county's official website, the 24    name of each delegate and alternate along with each 25    delegate's and alternate's corresponding veteran service 26    organization.   SB3646- 16 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1        (1.5) Each duly appointed delegate and alternate must 2    successfully complete an online electronic training 3    curriculum, developed and administered by the Veterans 4    Assistance Provost, acting on behalf of the Attorney 5    General, within 30 days after the delegate or alternate is 6    seated. Each delegate or alternate successfully completing 7    the electronic training curriculum shall file a copy of 8    the affirmation and certificate of completion with the 9    Veterans Assistance Commission. If any delegate or 10    alternate fails to complete the training required under 11    this paragraph, within 30 days after beginning his or her 12    term of service, then that delegate or alternate shall be 13    stripped of any voting rights until that delegate or 14    alternate completes the training and affirmation. 15        (2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), veteran 16    service organizations shall be permitted to select one 17    delegate and one alternate.18        (3) In counties with 5 or more of the same veteran 19    service organizations, all the constituent veteran service 20    organizations shall be permitted to select up to 5 21    delegates and 5 alternates to represent that veteran 22    service organization instead of each constituent veteran 23    service organization selecting one delegate and one 24    alternate. For the purposes of meeting the majority 25    requirement of this subsection, when the constituent 26    groups of a veteran service organization choose to select   SB3646- 17 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    those delegates and alternates, those selected and duly 2    appointed delegates and alternates shall represent the 3    aggregate percentage of the constituent groups.4        (4) If a veteran service organization serves more than 5    one county, then it shall be permitted to select one 6    delegate and one alternate for the Veterans Assistance 7    Commission in each county in which at least 25% of its 8    members reside. 9        (4.5) Within 30 days after the delegates and 10    alternates are seated, each Veterans Assistance Commission 11    shall publish electronically on its website or on the 12    webpage of its county's website the name of each delegate 13    and alternate along with the Commission's corresponding 14    veteran service organization, the name of the commander, 15    quartermaster, or commandant of that veteran service 16    organization, and the mailing address of that veteran 17    service organization. 18        (5) All undertakings of, or actions taken by, the 19    Commission shall require a vote from a majority of the 20    full commission membership. No committee or other subgroup 21    of delegates and alternates formed by the Commission, 22    whether selected or appointed, may be granted the power or 23    authority to act in the place of or on behalf of the full 24    body of the duly selected or appointed Commission 25    membership.26        (6) No superintendent or any other employee of the   SB3646- 18 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    Veterans Assistance Commission may retain the position of 2    delegate or alternate or any voting rights while employed 3    by the Veterans Assistance Commission.4        (7) No committee or other subgroup of delegates and 5    alternates formed by the Commission, whether selected or 6    appointed, may bar any other duly appointed Commission 7    member from attending or otherwise being present during 8    any closed meetings or sessions of that committee or 9    group.10        (8) The county may, at its discretion, appoint a 11    representative to the Commission who may attend any public 12    meeting of the Commission. That representative shall be a 13    veteran, may not have voting rights, may not hold any 14    office or title on the Commission, and may not be present 15    during any nonpublic meeting of the Commission, except as 16    authorized in this Act. For matters of executive session, 17    the non-voting county appointee may attend meetings that 18    are closed in accordance with paragraphs (1), (3), (5), 19    (6), or (11) of subsection (c) of Section 2 of the Open 20    Meetings Act for litigation matters not relating to 21    litigation between the Commission and the County. 22        (9) A Veterans Assistance Commission may not establish 23    or operate a not-for-profit corporation that has a 24    substantially similar name to that of the Veterans 25    Assistance Commission. 26        (10) A Veterans Assistance Commission may receive any   SB3646- 19 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    unsolicited gift, grant, donation, or legacy made for the 2    purpose of assisting veterans or in furtherance of such 3    interests. Any such unsolicited gift, grant, donation, or 4    legacy shall be subject to reporting and auditing 5    requirements as mandated by law. 6    (b) The Commission and its selected or appointed 7superintendent shall have oversight of the distribution of all 8moneys and supplies appropriated for the benefit of military 9veterans and their families, subject to such rules, 10regulations, administrative procedures or audit reviews as are 11required by this Act and as are necessary as approved by the 12Commission to carry out the spirit and intent of this Act. No 13warrant authorized under this Act may be issued for the 14payment of money without the presentation of an itemized 15statement or claim, approved by the superintendent of the 16Commission. No county may refuse to process and pay a warrant 17issued in accordance with this Act. 18    (c) The superintendent of the Veterans Assistance 19Commission, selected, appointed, or hired by the Commission is 20an at-will employee who shall be answerable to, and shall 21report to, the Commission.22    (d) The superintendent shall be evaluated annually and a 23written report shall be generated. A copy of the report from 24the evaluation shall be provided to the entire Commission 25membership.26    (e) A superintendent may be removed from office if, after   SB3646- 20 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1delegates from no less than 3 different veteran service 2organizations file a written request calling for the 3superintendent's removal, there is a vote from a majority of 4the full Commission membership in favor of such removal. If a 5Commission is comprised of only 2 veteran service 6organizations, then the superintendent may be removed from 7office if, after delegates from both veteran service 8organizations file a written request calling for the 9superintendent's removal, there is a vote from a majority of 10the full Commission membership in favor of such removal. 11     An employee of the Commission, other than the 12superintendent, may be removed from the employee's position 13if, after the superintendent has brought such removal action 14before the Commission for consideration, there is a vote from 15a majority of the full Commission membership in favor of such 16removal. 17    (f) Each Veterans Assistance Commission shall establish 18and maintain bylaws that outline the framework, policies, and 19procedures for conducting the business of the Commission and 20for the rules and regulations that apply to its members. Those 21bylaws shall reflect compliance with all relevant laws at the 22time they are established and shall be revised as necessary to 23remain in compliance with current law. The establishment of 24those bylaws, and any revisions thereafter, shall require a 25minimum two-thirds majority vote of approval from a majority 26of the full Commission membership.  SB3646- 21 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    (g) Each Veterans Assistance Commission shall, in writing, 2adopt all applicable policies already established and in place 3in its respective county. Such policies must include, but are 4, including, but not limited to, policies related to 5compensation, employee rights, ethics, procurement, financial 6assistance, donations, and budget, and shall adapt those 7policies to fit its organizational structure and needs as 8determined in the sole discretion of the Commission. The 9adapted policies must be reasonably similar to the 10corresponding county policies. Those policies shall then be 11considered the policies of the Veterans Assistance Commission 12and they shall be implemented and adhered to, accordingly, by 13the superintendent and by the Commission. The Commission shall 14amend its adopted policies whenever a county board amends an 15applicable policy within 90 60 days of the county board 16amendment. However, nothing in this subsection shall be 17construed to permit a county or its policies to control a 18Veteran Assistance Commission's operations. 19    (h) No warrant authorized under this Act may be issued for 20the payment of money without the presentation of an itemized 21statement or claim, approved by the superintendent of the 22Commission and reported to the full Commission membership. No 23county may refuse payment on such a warrant after approval of 24the itemized statement or claim by the superintendent.25    (i) Each Veterans Assistance Commission shall perform an 26annual audit in accordance with the Governmental Account Audit   SB3646- 22 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1Act using either the auditing services provided by its 2respective county or the services of an independent auditor 3whose services shall be paid for by the Commission. A copy of 4that audit report shall be provided to the Veterans Assistance 5Provost on behalf of the Attorney General and the president or 6chairperson of the county board of the Commission's respective 7county. The audit report shall also be made publicly available 8online. For these purposes the Veterans Assistance Commission 9shall maintain a website or webpage as part of its respective 10county's official website.11    (j) Veterans Assistance Commissions and county boards 12subject to this Act shall cooperate fully with the boards, 13commissions, agencies, departments, and institutions of the 14State. The funds held and made available by the county, the 15State, or any other source shall be subject to financial and 16compliance audits in accordance with the Illinois State 17Auditing Act. 18    (k) The Veterans Assistance Commission shall be in charge 19of the administration of any benefits provided under Articles 20VI and IX of the Illinois Public Aid Code for military veterans 21and their families.22    (l) The Veterans Assistance Commission shall represent 23veterans in their application for or attempts to obtain 24benefits and services through State and federal agencies, 25including representing veterans in their appeals of adverse 26decisions.  SB3646- 23 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    (m) The superintendent of the Veterans Assistance 2Commission and its employees must comply with the procedures 3and regulations adopted by the Veterans Assistance Commission 4and the regulations of the Department of Human Services.5    (n) To further the intent of this Act of assisting 6military veterans, this Act is to be construed so that the 7Veterans Assistance Commission shall provide needed services 8to eligible veterans. Such services shall include the 9provision of assistance as set forth in this Act and the 10Illinois Public Aid Code. 11    (o)(1) In counties that did not have a Veterans Assistance 12Commission prior to January 1, 2026, and in which there exists 13a judicial circuit whose jurisdictional boundaries include 14multiple counties, veteran service organizations located 15within any of those counties that are within the judicial 16circuit's jurisdictional boundaries may come together and 17create a Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission that 18shall provide services to veterans and their families. The 19Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission shall be known 20as the Veterans Assistance Commission of that judicial 21circuit.22    (2) The superintendent of a Jurisdictional Veterans 23Assistance Commission formed in accordance with paragraph (1) 24shall be selected from among all honorably discharged veterans 25of all participating counties within that judicial circuit's 26boundaries and shall maintain a centrally located office   SB3646- 24 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1within that judicial circuit. However, for a Jurisdictional 2Veterans Assistance Commission formed within a large judicial 3circuit, the superintendent is not precluded from having 4multiple offices that shall be owned and maintained by the 5Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission.6    (3) Delegates and alternates shall be selected by the 7veterans service organizations of that judicial circuit in the 8same manner as prescribed in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 9and shall be subject to the online electronic training 10requirements imposed on delegates and alternates appointed to 11a single-county Veterans Assistance Commission as prescribed 12in paragraph (1.5) of subsection (a).13    (4) Every Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission 14must publish electronically on its website the name of each 15appointed delegate and alternate as prescribed in paragraph 16(4.5) of subsection (a) for single-county Veterans Assistance 17Commissions. 18    (5) Every Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission 19shall be subject to the same prohibitions, standards, 20discretionary authority, and other requirements single-county 21Veterans Assistance Commissions are subject to under this 22Section unless otherwise provided. 23    (6) Any existing Veterans Assistance Commission that is 24part of a judicial circuit that is comprised of multiple 25counties, as of January 1, 2025, may merge into a Veterans 26Assistance Commission of that judicial circuit with its   SB3646- 25 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1neighboring counties. Those existing Veterans Assistance 2Commissions that choose not to merge may continue to exist 3independently while the other counties combine to form a new 4Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission of that judicial 5circuit.6    (7) Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 104th General 7Assembly shall be interpreted to restrict any Jurisdictional 8Veterans Assistance Commissions from providing services to 9veterans and their families who reside outside of those 10participating counties.11(Source: P.A. 102-484, eff. 8-20-21; 102-732, eff. 1-1-23; 12102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.) 13    (330 ILCS 45/9.1)14    Sec. 9.1. Violations.15    (a) If the Attorney General has reasonable cause to 16believe that there is or has been a violation of Section 2, 8, 17or 9, or subsection (a), (b), or (c) of Section 10, then the 18Attorney General shall be empowered to issue and cause to be 19served on any person or entity an order to cease and desist 20from further violation of this Act. The Attorney General may 21also commence a civil action in the name of the People of the 22State to enforce the provisions of this Act in any appropriate 23circuit court. The court, in its discretion, may exercise all 24powers necessary, including, but not limited to: injunction; 25mandamus; revocation; forfeiture or suspension of any funding,   SB3646- 26 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1rights, privileges, responsibilities, or support, as deemed 2necessary to ensure compliance; and any other action the court 3may deem appropriate.4    (b) Prior to initiating a civil action, the Attorney 5General shall conduct a preliminary investigation to determine 6whether there is reasonable cause to believe that a violation 7is being or has been committed and whether the dispute can be 8resolved without litigation. In conducting this investigation, 9the Attorney General may:10        (1) require the individual, group, or entity to file a 11    statement or report in writing under oath or otherwise, as 12    to all information the Attorney General may consider 13    necessary;14        (2) examine under oath any person alleged to have 15    participated in or with knowledge of the alleged 16    violation;17        (3) issue subpoenas or conduct hearings in aid of any 18    investigation; or19        (4) examine any record, book, document, account, or 20    paper as the Attorney General may consider necessary.21    (c) Service by the Attorney General of any notice 22requiring a person to file a statement or report, or of a 23subpoena upon any person, shall be made:24        (1) personally by delivery of a duly executed copy 25    thereof to the person to be served or, if a person is not a 26    natural person, in the manner provided by the Code of   SB3646- 27 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    Civil Procedure when a complaint is filed; or2        (2) by mailing by certified mail a duly executed copy 3    thereof to the person to be served at the person's last 4    known abode or principal place of business within this 5    State.6    (d) Whenever any person fails to comply with any subpoena 7issued under this Section or whenever satisfactory copying or 8reproduction of any material requested in an investigation 9cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the 10material, the Attorney General may file in any appropriate 11circuit court, and serve upon the person, a petition for a 12court order for the enforcement of the subpoena or other 13request.14    Any person who has received a subpoena issued under 15subsection (b) may file in the appropriate circuit court, and 16serve upon the Attorney General, a petition for a court order 17to modify or set aside the subpoena or other request. The 18petition must be filed either: (1) within 20 days after the 19date of service of the subpoena or at any time before the 20return date specified in the subpoena, whichever date is 21earlier, or (2) within a longer period as may be prescribed in 22writing by the Attorney General.23    The petition shall specify each ground upon which the 24petitioner relies in seeking relief under this subsection and 25may be based upon any failure of the subpoena to comply with 26the provisions of this Section or upon any constitutional or   SB3646- 28 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1other legal right or privilege of the petitioner. During the 2pendency of the petition in the court, the court may stay, as 3it deems proper, the running of the time allowed for 4compliance with the subpoena or other request, in whole or in 5part, except that the petitioner shall comply with any portion 6of the subpoena or other request not sought to be modified or 7set aside.8    (e) In the administration of this Act, the Attorney 9General may accept an Assurance of Voluntary Compliance with 10respect to any violation of the Act from any person or entity 11who has engaged in, is engaging in, or was about to engage in 12such violation. Evidence of a violation of an Assurance of 13Voluntary Compliance shall be prima facie evidence of a 14violation of this Act in any subsequent proceeding brought by 15the Attorney General against the alleged violator.16    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require 17the Attorney General to investigate alleged violations or 18pursue litigation before a Veterans Assistance Commission or 19Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission or 20superintendent of such a commission may pursue mandamus, 21declaratory judgment, or any other available legal remedy. 22(Source: P.A. 102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.) 23    (330 ILCS 45/9.2)24    Sec. 9.2. Remedies.25    (a) Whenever the Attorney General has reason to believe   SB3646- 29 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1that any person, group, or entity is violating, has violated, 2or is about to violate Section 2, 8, or 9, or subsection (a), 3(b), or (c) of Section 10, the Attorney General may bring an 4action in the name of the People of the State against the 5person, group, or entity to restrain by preliminary or 6permanent injunction the use of any practice that violates 7Section 2, 8, or 9, or subsection (a), (b), or (c) of Section 810. In such an action, the court may award restitution to 9recoup the loss of moneys set aside to provide services to 10veterans or any other relief that the court deems proper.11    (b) In addition, the court may assess a civil penalty not 12to exceed $5,000 for each violation of Section 2, 8, or 9, or 13subsection (a), (b), or (c) of Section 10.14    (c) In any action brought in accordance with Section 9.1 15or 9.2 under the provisions of Section 8 or 9 or subsection 16(a), (b), or (c) of Section 10, the Attorney General is 17entitled to recover costs.18    (d) If a court orders a party to make payments to the 19Attorney General and the payments are to be used for the 20operations of the Office of the Attorney General or a party 21agrees, in an out-of-court settlement, to make payment to the 22Attorney General for the operations of the Office of the 23Attorney General, then moneys shall be deposited into the 24Attorney General Court Ordered and Voluntary Compliance 25Payment Projects Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used, 26subject to appropriation, for the performance of any function   SB3646- 30 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1pertaining to the exercise of the duties of the Attorney 2General, including, but not limited to, enforcement of any law 3of this State and conducting public education programs. 4However, any moneys in the Fund that are required by the court 5or by an agreement to be used for a particular purpose shall be 6used for that purpose.7(Source: P.A. 102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.) 8    (330 ILCS 45/9.3 new)9    Sec. 9.3. Veterans Assistance Provost.10    (a) The Attorney General shall appoint a Veterans 11Assistance Provost and provide staff as are deemed necessary 12by the Attorney General for the Veterans Assistance Provost. 13The Veterans Assistance Provost shall be an attorney licensed 14to practice in Illinois. 15    (b) Through the Veterans Assistance Provost, the Attorney 16General shall have the power to establish training for 17delegates and alternates of each Veterans Assistance 18Commission and Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission, 19provide instruction and education concerning this Act, 20facilitate the resolution of disputes concerning the 21provisions of this Act, and carry out the enforcement of this 22Act as provided.  23    (330 ILCS 45/10)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3090)24    Sec. 10. Superintendents and counties.   SB3646- 31 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1    (a) As used in this Section, "Commission", when a 2particular entity is not specified, means a Veterans 3Assistance Commission or a Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance 4Commission, or both, according to the specific context. 5    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (o) of 6Section 9 for a Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission, 7the The executive powers of a the Commission shall be vested in 8a superintendent selected or appointed by a vote from a 9majority of the full Commission membership and who shall have 10received an honorable discharge from the armed forces of the 11United States.12    (b) Superintendent vacancies shall be filled, whether 13long-term or temporarily, at the next regularly scheduled full 14Commission meeting or within 30 days at a specially convened 15meeting, whichever comes sooner, and shall be selected by a 16vote from a majority of the full Commission membership.17    (c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (o) of 18Section 9 for a Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission, 19any Any individual who may be tasked with assuming the duties 20of or may be vested with the executive powers of a 21superintendent, whether as acting or interim superintendent, 22must be selected or appointed by a vote from a majority of the 23full Commission membership and must have received an honorable 24discharge from the armed forces of the United States. 25    (d) Under the direction of the Commission which shall have 26final discretion in selecting an appropriate office facility,   SB3646- 32 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1the The designated superintendent of the Veterans Assistance 2Commission of the county shall, under the direction of the 3Commission, have charge of and maintain an office at in the 4county building or a central location within the county or at a 5location which is otherwise convenient to veterans and their 6families in the discretion of the Commission, to be used 7solely by the Commission for providing the just, necessary, 8and needed services mandated by law. The office may be in the 9county building if there is available room and such facilities 10are acceptable to the Commission. 11    The designated superintendent of a Jurisdictional Veterans 12Assistance Commission shall have charge of and maintain an 13office in accordance with the provisions under subsection (o) 14of Section 9. 15    (e) From its own general fund, the The county where the 16Veterans Assistance Commission or Jurisdictional Veterans 17Assistance Commission is headquartered or organized shall 18provide for the funding of the office and provide all 19necessary furnishings, supplies, and services as passed by the 20county board in its annual appropriation, and the county shall 21provide or fund services, including, but not limited to, human 22resources and payroll support; information technology services 23and equipment; telephone services and equipment; printing 24services and equipment; postage costs; and liability 25insurance. Such funding may not be drawn from the tax levied 26under Section 5-2006 of the Counties Code and Section 12-21.13   SB3646- 33 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1of the Illinois Public Aid Code or from State funds from the 2Department of Human Services. Any litigation or legal 3settlement that has a financial impact to the county is 4subject to the approval of the county board.5    (f) The county where the Veterans Assistance Commission or 6Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission is headquartered 7or organized shall also provide to the employees of the 8Commission all benefits available to county employees, 9including, but not limited to, benefits offered through the 10Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund or any other applicable 11county retirement fund; health, life, and dental insurance; 12and workers compensation insurance. Employer contributions and 13costs for these benefits, services, and coverages may come 14from Commission funds. However, such funding may not be drawn 15from the tax levied under Section 5-2006 of the Counties Code 16and Section 12-21.13 of the Illinois Public Aid Code or from 17State funds from the Department of Human Services. Counties 18not currently providing benefits to Commission employees must 19comply with this subsection within 90 days after the effective 20date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly. 21    (g) The county board shall, in any county where a Veterans 22Assistance Commission or Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance 23Commission is headquartered or is organized, in addition to 24sums appropriated for these just, necessary, and needed 25services as provided by law and approved by the Commission 26under this Act, appropriate such additional sums, upon   SB3646- 34 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1recommendation of the Veterans Assistance Commission or 2Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission, to properly 3compensate, in accordance with the requirements of subsection 4(g) of Section 9 and subsection (e) of this Section, the 5officers and employees required to administer such assistance 6in accordance with the policies, procedures, and resolutions 7of the Commission. The county board shall also provide funds 8to the Veterans Assistance Commission or Jurisdictional 9Veterans Assistance Commission Commission to reimburse the 10superintendent, officers, delegates, and employees for certain 11expenses which are approved by the Commission. Funding for 12compensation and reimbursements under this subsection may be 13drawn from the tax levied under Section 5-2006 of the Counties 14Code and Section 12-21.13 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. The 15superintendent and other employees shall be employees of the 16Veterans Assistance Commission Jurisdictional Veterans 17Assistance Commission, and no provision in this Section or 18elsewhere in this Act shall be construed to mean that they are 19employees of the county or that the county has any discretion 20or oversight as to the compensation, benefits, or other terms 21and conditions of employment of Veterans Assistance Commission 22employees or Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission 23employees; such discretion rests solely and exclusively with 24the Commission. However, a provider of employee benefits may 25consider Veterans Assistance Commission employees or 26Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission employees as   SB3646- 35 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1county employees for the purpose of administering employee 2benefits. The changes to this subsection made by this 3amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are a declaration 4of existing law and shall not be construed as a new enactment.5    (h) Superintendents, subject to rules formulated by the 6Commission, shall select, as far as possible, Veteran Service 7Officers and other employees from among military veterans, 8including those who have served or may still be serving as 9members of the Illinois National Guard or a reserve component 10of the armed forces of the United States, who did not receive a 11bad conduct or dishonorable discharge or other equivalent 12discharge thereof, or their spouses, surviving spouses, or 13children. Employees of the Commission shall be at-will 14employees.15    (i) In a county with less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, the 16superintendent may, in conformance with subsection (f) of 17Section 3-9005 of the Counties Code, request from the State's 18Attorney serving the county in which the Veterans Assistance 19Commission is located, an opinion upon any question of law 20relating to a matter in which the county Veterans Assistance 21Commission may be concerned. With regard to matters involving 22Section 2, 8, or 9, or subsection (a), (b), or (c) of Section 2310, the State's Attorney shall confer with the Office of the 24Attorney General before rendering an opinion. 25    (j) Superintendents of all counties subject to this Act, 26when required by the Commission, shall give bond in the sum of   SB3646- 36 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1$2,000 for the faithful performance of their duties.2    (k) All persons selected or appointed to fill positions 3provided for in this Section shall be exempt from the 4operation and provisions of any civil service act or laws of 5this State, and the secretary of the Commission shall be 6appointed by the superintendent.7    (l) If any Veterans Assistance Commission or 8Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission fails to timely 9submit to the Veterans Assistance Provost, acting on behalf of 10the Attorney General, copies of the audits and reports 11required under this Act, or fails to publish the audits and 12reports as required under this Act, then the superintendent or 13interim superintendent of that Veterans Assistance Commission 14or Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission shall be 15fined an amount no greater than $50 for each month or portion 16of each month that the Veterans Assistance Commission or 17Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission fails to submit 18the audit or report, or fails to publish the audit or report as 19required under this Act. The State's Attorney of the county in 20which the Veterans Assistance Commission or Jurisdictional 21Veterans Assistance Commission is located or the Attorney 22General may apply to the circuit court of the district or 23county for relief by mandamus requiring the superintendent or 24interim superintendent to pay the fine. The fine shall be 25payable to the county in which the Veterans Assistance 26Commission or Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission is   SB3646- 37 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1located and shall be deposited into the general corporate fund 2of that county. 3(Source: P.A. 102-56, eff. 7-9-21; 102-732, eff. 1-1-23; 4102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.)  SB3646- 38 -LRB104 17695 KTG 31126 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    55 ILCS 5/5-2006from Ch. 34, par. 5-20064    305 ILCS 5/12-21.13from Ch. 23, par. 12-21.135    330 ILCS 45/1from Ch. 23, par. 30816    330 ILCS 45/2from Ch. 23, par. 30827    330 ILCS 45/8from Ch. 23, par. 30888    330 ILCS 45/9from Ch. 23, par. 30899    330 ILCS 45/9.110    330 ILCS 45/9.211    330 ILCS 45/9.3 new12    330 ILCS 45/10from Ch. 23, par. 3090